Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Chapter 17 Contests

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

26 Am. Jur. 2d Elections §§ 381 to 443.

Admissibility of parol evidence of election officials to impeach election returns, 46 ALR2d 1385.

State court jurisdiction over contest involving primary election for member of congress, 68 ALR2d 1320.

29 C.J.S. Elections §§ 401 to 539.

§ 22-17-101.
Right to contest elections; exception; grounds.

A qualified elector may contest the right of a person declared elected to an office in the elector’s county, municipality, district or precinct, other than the office of state legislator, United States president and vice-president and presidential elector, on the following grounds:

Misconduct or material negligence of an election official which affected the result of the election;

The person whose election is contested is not eligible to hold the office;

The person whose election is contested offered to give a bribe to a voter or election official to procure his election;

Illegal votes were counted or legal votes were not counted;

The person whose election is contested violated the provisions of W. S.

22-26-101

through

22-26-121

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-242; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 35, § 2.

Cross references. —

For grounds to contest ballot proposition, see §

22-17-106

.

For grounds of contesting election of state legislator, see §

22-17-109

.

For provision that the legislature shall pass laws to secure purity of elections and guard against abuse of franchise, see art. 6, § 13, Wyo. Const.

For provision as to election contests, see art. 6, § 14, Wyo. Const.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Presumption in favor of validity of election. —

Every reasonable presumption will be indulged in favor of the validity of an election which has been held under the applicable statutory provision, and the one asserting that the election is irregular must bear the burden of showing that it is otherwise. Reitveld v. Northern Wyo. Community College Dist., 344 P.2d 986,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1959).

And an election is not to be set aside for mere informalities or irregularities

unless they are shown to have affected the result of the election. Reitveld v. Northern Wyo. Community College Dist., 344 P.2d 986,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1959).

Purging illegal votes. —

Court may purge poll of illegal votes cast without fault of candidates by deducting them proportionately from both candidates according to vote for each. Hamilton v. Marshall, 41 Wyo. 157, 282 P. 1058,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1929).

Voting after closing hour. —

Irregularity in keeping polls open after closing hour when votes were cast was insufficient ground of contest unless it materially affected result. Hamilton v. Marshall, 41 Wyo. 157, 282 P. 1058,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1929).

Where it was alleged sufficient votes were cast after voting hours to change result, court in election contest must deduct them proportionately from vote for each candidate. Hamilton v. Marshall, 41 Wyo. 157, 282 P. 1058,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1929).

Applied

in

Karn v. Hayes, 530 P.2d 156,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1975).

Quoted

in

Smith v. Brito, 2007 WY 191, 173 P.3d 351,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(2007).

§ 22-17-102.
Commencement by verified petition; contents.

Election contests for all primary election offices and all general election offices other than state legislators, United States president and vice-president and presidential elector, may be commenced by the contestant filing with the clerk of the district court of the county, within fourteen (14) days after the results of the election have been certified by the canvassing board, a verified petition setting forth specifically:

The name of the contestant and that he is a registered elector in the county, district or precinct in which the office is to be exercised;

The name of the person whose election is being contested;

The office;

The grounds for the contest.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-243; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 35, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 22-17-103.
Summons; conduct of suit.

Summons shall be issued against the person whose election is being contested and upon the election official responsible for conducting the election. The suit shall be conducted as a civil action and shall be considered for an expedited docket.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-244; 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

Quoted

in

Smith v. Brito, 2007 WY 191, 173 P.3d 351,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(2007).

§ 22-17-104.
Judgment for costs.

If the proceedings in an election contest are dismissed for insufficiency, or want of prosecution, or if the election is confirmed by the court, judgment shall be rendered for costs against the party contesting the election and in favor of the party whose election was contested. If the election is annulled and set aside for grounds stated in W.S. 22-17-101(a)(ii), (iii) or (v), judgment for costs shall be rendered against the party whose election was contested and in favor of the party contesting the election. If the election is annulled and set aside for the grounds stated in W.S. 22-17-101(a)(i) or (iv), judgment and costs shall be rendered against the county.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-245; 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

Annulment of winning candidate's election. —

Where a losing candidate in a town council election successfully challenged the election of the winning candidate who was not a registered voter when he filed his petition, resulting in the annulment of the winning candidate's election but not the voiding of the entire election, an award of costs from the winning candidate to the losing candidate was mandated. Smith v. Brito, 2007 WY 191, 173 P.3d 351,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 2007).

§ 22-17-105.
Ballot propositions contestable; nature of action.

A ballot proposition which may by law be submitted to a vote of the people of a county, city or town, district, or other political subdivision may be contested by a petition of five (5) registered electors of the county, city or town, district or other political subdivision filed in the district court of the county not later than fifteen (15) days after the results of the election have been certified by the canvassing board. A ballot proposition contest is a civil action.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-246.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

Cited

in

Snell v. Johnson County Sch. Dist. No. 1, 2004 WY 19, 86 P.3d 248,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(2004).

Particular Contests. —

“Proposition”
to be placed on the “ballot” under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

18-3-501

(size of county commission) is in fact a “ballot proposition”
under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

22-17-105

and

22-17-106

. Rock v. Lankford, 2013 WY 61, 301 P.3d 1075,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2013).

Lawsuit was
an election contest governed by Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

22-17-105

and

22-17-106

because it asked the court to (1) declare null and void
an election in which voters passed a proposition returning the size
of the county commission to three and (2) direct the county clerk
to hold an election based on a board composed of five members. The
remedy sought would have defeated the public interest in the stability
and finality of election results and could only result from a declaration
that the special election was void, which was the very essence of
an election contest. Rock v. Lankford, 2013 WY 61, 301 P.3d 1075,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2013).

Suit by three
challengers to a ballot proposition that returned the size of the
county commission to three was dismissed because the challengers
failed
to bring the contest within the time specified in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

22-17-105

and through the five electors required. Rock v. Lankford, 2013 WY 61, 301 P.3d 1075,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2013).

§ 22-17-106.
Grounds for contesting ballot propositions.

A ballot proposition may be contested for any of the following reasons:

Misconduct or material negligence of an election official which affected the result of the election;

The election result was influenced by a bribe;

Illegal votes were counted or legal votes were not counted.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-247.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Particular Contests. —

“Proposition”
to be placed on the “ballot” under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

18-3-501

(size of county commission) is in fact a “ballot proposition”
under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

22-17-105

and

22-17-106

. Rock v. Lankford, 2013 WY 61, 301 P.3d 1075,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2013).

Lawsuit was
an election contest governed by Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

22-17-105

and

22-17-106

because it asked the court to (1) declare null and void
an election in which voters passed a proposition returning the size
of the county commission to three and (2) direct the county clerk
to hold an election based on a board composed of five members. The
remedy sought would have defeated the public interest in the stability
and finality of election results and could only result from a declaration
that the special election was void, which was the very essence of
an election contest. Rock v. Lankford, 2013 WY 61, 301 P.3d 1075,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2013).

Suit by three
challengers to a ballot proposition that returned the size of the
county commission to three was dismissed because the challengers
failed
to bring the contest within the time specified in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

22-17-105

and through the five electors required. Rock v. Lankford, 2013 WY 61, 301 P.3d 1075,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2013).

Cited

in

Snell v. Johnson County Sch. Dist. No. 1, 2004 WY 19, 86 P.3d 248,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(2004).

§ 22-17-107.
Defense of contested ballot proposition.

A contested ballot proposition shall be defended by the following officers:

Statewide proposition — attorney general;

Countywide proposition — county attorney;

Municipal proposition — municipal attorney;

School or community college district or other special district proposition — the appropriate school board, community college board or special district governing body.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-248; 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 22-17-108.
Court judgment in contests.

A judgment of the court in an election contest shall confirm or annul the election or declare elected a qualified candidate receiving the highest number of legal votes, or declare the result of the election on each contested ballot proposition. The election of a candidate receiving the highest number of legal votes but disqualified for any other legal reason shall be declared null and void and a vacancy will be declared to exist. For offices to be filled by more than one (1) candidate, the election shall not be declared null and void but the qualified candidates receiving the highest number of legal votes shall be declared elected.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-249.

Court errs in directing special election following election with unqualified candidate. —

The district court correctly ruled that a candidate, who had been convicted of a felony in another state and who had not had his rights restored in Wyoming, was unqualified to run for county commissioner. The fact that Wyoming might have treated the candidate's conviction as a misdemeanor had it occurred here, and that the candidate did not lose his civil rights in the state of conviction, did not alter this outcome. However, the court erred in issuing a writ of mandamus directing the holding of a special election, as a judgment annulling the election in which the unqualified candidate's name appeared on the ballot was the appropriate remedy. Mills v. Campbell County Canvassing Bd., 707 P.2d 747,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 588

(Wyo. 1985).

Where a losing candidate in a town council election successfully challenged the election of the winning candidate who was not a registered voter when he filed his petition, the correct remedy was to not void the entire council election but rather to annul the election of the winning candidate and to declare elected the qualified candidate receiving the highest number of legal votes. Smith v. Brito, 2007 WY 191, 173 P.3d 351,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 2007).

Quoted

in

Rock v. Lankford, 2013 WY 61,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(May 17, 2013).

§ 22-17-109.
Contesting election of state legislator; generally.

The election of a member of the state legislature may be contested by a registered elector of the legislator’s county or district, upon any of the grounds specified by law for the contest of the election of other elected officials. The state senate and house of representatives respectively shall hear and determine contests of the election of their members. Each house is authorized to provide its own rules for resolving contests of its members.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-250.

Cross references. —

For grounds to contest elections generally, see §

22-17-101

.

For provision that each house shall be judge of election returns and qualification of members, see art. 3, § 10, Wyo. Const.

§ 22-17-110.
Contesting election of state legislator; commencement.

A contest of the election of a member of the state legislature shall be commenced within thirty (30) days after his election has been certified by the state canvassing board by serving him personally or at his mailing address with a notice of intent to contest setting forth the grounds for the contest. A copy of that notice must be filed by the contestant with the secretary of state within thirty (30) days after the contested member’s election has been certified by the state canvassing board.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-251; 1995, ch. 43, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

§ 22-17-111.
Contesting election of state legislator; taking of depositions.

In a contest of the election of a member of the state legislature, depositions may be taken by either party after service of the notice of intent to contest. Depositions shall be taken as in a civil action and the officer taking depositions has the power to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, objects, and other evidence, by subpoena.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-252.

Cross references. —

As to taking of depositions generally, see Rules 26 to 32, W.R.C.P.

§ 22-17-112.
Contesting election of state legislator; handling of depositions by secretary of state; additional depositions.

A copy of a notice to take a deposition with proof of service, and the deposition, shall be sealed and mailed to the secretary of state by the person requesting the deposition with an endorsement showing the names of the contesting parties, the legislative office contested, and the nature of the papers. The secretary of state shall then deliver each such sealed notice for deposition to the presiding officer of the branch of the legislature to which the contest relates on the first day of its session.

Each house of the legislature may take additional depositions and subpoena and examine witnesses.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-253.

§ 22-17-113.
Contesting election of state legislator; legislative determination final.

A determination by either house of the legislature of the result of an election contest affecting one (1) of its members is final and conclusive and is not subject to judicial review.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-254.

§ 22-17-114.
Contesting election of president, vice-president or presidential elector.

The election of a United States president and vice-president candidate, or presidential elector, shall only be contested, presented to and tried before the Wyoming legislature under joint rules of the house of representatives and senate. Such a contest may be initiated by a Wyoming elector by filing notice with the legislature through the legislative service office no later than five (5) days after the election is certified by the state canvassing board. The contest shall only be brought on the grounds provided by W.S. 22-17-101(a)(i) or (iv). A determination of the contest by the legislature is final and conclusive and is not subject to judicial review.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 35, § 1.